Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

State Capitol Commission

4-8-301. Established — Membership — Chair — Compensation.

There is hereby created the state capitol commission, which shall be composed of seven (7) ex officio members, as follows: the commissioner of general services, the comptroller of the treasury, the secretary of state, the state treasurer, the commissioner of finance and administration, the commissioner of environment and conservation, and the chair of the Tennessee historical commission, or their respective designees. In addition, the membership shall include two (2) legislative members as follows: one (1) member appointed by the speaker of the senate and one (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The commission membership shall also include three (3) private citizens appointed by the governor to staggered terms of three (3) years.

In appointing private citizens to serve on the state capitol commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) such citizen serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) such citizen serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

At least one (1) of the private citizens appointed by the governor shall be a black person.

In appointing private citizens to serve on the state capitol commission, the governor shall appoint one (1) person from each of the three (3) grand divisions of the state.

The private citizen members serving on the commission on March 20, 2012, shall continue to serve until they either vacate their positions or their terms of office expire, whichever occurs first, whereupon the governor shall appoint persons to fill the positions in accordance with subdivision (a)(2)(C)(i).

The commission membership shall also include one (1) private citizen member to be appointed by the speaker of the senate and one (1) private citizen member to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The members appointed under subdivision (a)(3)(A) shall serve terms of three (3) years, with such terms to begin on July 1 and expire on June 30, every three (3) years thereafter.

The governor shall appoint a chair from among the full membership of the commission.

All members shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1986, ch. 838, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 1; 1998, ch. 688, § 2; 2012, ch. 586, § 3; 2020, ch. 768, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The state capitol commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§4-29-112,4-29-247.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-8-302. Powers and duties.

The state capitol commission has the following power and duty to:

Formulate and develop a plenary master plan and program for the adaptive restoration and preservation of the state capitol, including the building and contiguous grounds;

Consistent with the master plan required in subdivision (a)(1), to establish policy controlling the furnishings, including, but not limited to, wall, floor and window coverings of the state capitol;

Establish policy governing maintenance of the state capitol;

Establish policy governing the use of the state capitol for any nongovernmental activities; and

Establish a policy relative to historical commemorative additions and improvements on the Bicentennial Mall, such as statues and monuments, and to approve such historical commemorative additions and improvements as may come with such policy; provided, that all other aspects of the administration of the Bicentennial Mall shall remain within the control and jurisdiction of the department of environment and conservation.

All actions of the commission pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to the concurrence of the state building commission.

Acts 1986, ch. 838, § 2; 1998, ch. 688, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The State Capitol Commission may establish a policy that prohibits smoking in the Capitol or permits smoking in certain areas thereof subject to (i) the concurrence of the State Building Commission and (ii) compliance with the requirements of T.C.A. §4-4-121, OAG 03-099, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (8/13/03).

4-8-303. Staff — Experts.

The department of general services, the state museum, the Tennessee historical society, and the office of the state architect shall provide appropriate staff to the state capitol commission.

In addition, the commission has the authority to contract pursuant to state law for the services of experts and specialists in the area of adaptive restoration and preservation of historic buildings. All contracts shall be executed by the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the attorney general and reporter; provided, that design and construction contracts are subject to the approval of the state building commission.

Acts 1986, ch. 838, § 3.

4-8-304. Reports.

The commission shall make an annual written report to the governor and general assembly. The report shall describe the activities of the commission during the preceding twelve (12) months and shall outline the activities for the ensuing twelve (12) months, with recommendations.

Acts 1986, ch. 838, § 4.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-8-305. Monument to unborn children.

The general assembly calls for a monument to be erected on the capitol campus as a reminder of unborn children. The monument shall be in memory of the victims of abortion, babies, women, and men.

One (1) member of the senate and one (1) member of the house of representatives, each appointed by their respective speaker, shall work with the state capitol commission to design and place the monument commissioned pursuant to subsection (a) at a suitable location on the capitol campus.

No state funds shall be spent on the construction or placement of the monument, and the monument must be erected using private funds. The members appointed pursuant to subsection (b) shall perform their duties when in Nashville for other official business.

There is created a separate account within the state general fund to be known as the Tennessee Monument to Unborn Children fund.

The fund must be funded by gifts, grants, and other donations received by the state for the fund from nonstate sources.

Money in the fund may be used for the design, construction, and installation of the monument.

At the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall carry forward any amounts remaining in the fund.

Moneys in the fund must be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the fund, and interest accruing on investments of and deposits into such fund must be returned to such fund and remain part of the fund.

After the completion of the monument, any moneys remaining in the fund must remain in the fund and be expended for the upkeep and maintenance of the monument until all monies in the fund are exhausted.

Upon completion of the monument, the state capitol commission shall name the monument the “Tennessee Monument to Unborn Children, In Memory of the Victims of Abortion: Babies, Women, and Men.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1057, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the Tennessee memorial to unborn children, please see Acts 2018, ch. 1057.